New York, session 2025-2026, S2336.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The division of military and naval affairs shall estab- 2 lish policies to ensure the security and protection of New York national 3 guard and air national guard recruiting centers from terrorist attacks. 4 2. The division shall only establish and maintain New York air 5 national guard or New York national guard recruiting centers and reserve 6 officer training centers at locations where individuals are permitted to 7 carry their own registered personal firearm while onsite of such train- 8 ing or recruiting center. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05417-01-5